Maine, session 132, LD575.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §850-B, sub-§7, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §7, is
amended to read:
7. Notice to employer. Absent an emergency, illness or other sudden necessity for
taking leave, an employee shall give reasonable notice to the employee's supervisor of the
employee's intent to use leave under this subchapter. Use of such leave must be scheduled
to prevent undue hardship on the employer as reasonably determined by the employer. If
an employer fails to provide notice as required under section 850‑I, the employee's
obligation to provide notice under this subsection is waived.